Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.048

Temporary cease and desist order—Injunction to enforce—Jurisdiction.

In the case of a violation or threatened violation of a temporary cease and desist order issued under RCW 33.04.044, the director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the association for an injunction to enforce the order, and the court shall issue an injunction if it determines that there has been a violation or threatened violation.

[ 1994 c 92 s 421; 1982 c 3 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.